Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 29
ENERGY EFFICIENT STATE BUILDINGS

Sec.

§ 39-2901. Short title. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2008, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 39-2902. Legislative findings and intent. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2008, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 39-2903. Definitions. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2008, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 39-2904. Major facility projects. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2008, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.